Utah statutes.
63A-3-203.   Accounting control over state departments and agencies --
Prescription and approval of financial forms, accounting systems, and fees.
(1)  The director of the Division of Finance shall:
(a)  exercise accounting control over all state departments and agencies
except institutions of higher education; and
(b)  prescribe the manner and method of certifying that funds are available
and adequate to meet all contracts and obligations.
(2)  The director shall audit all claims against the state for which an
appropriation has been made.
(3) (a)  The director shall:
(i)  prescribe all forms of requisitions, receipts, vouchers, bills, or claims
to be used by all state departments and agencies;
(ii)  prescribe the forms, procedures, and records to be maintained by all
departmental, institutional, or agency store rooms;
(iii)  exercise inventory control over the store rooms; and
(iv)  prescribe all forms to be used by the division.
(b)  Before approving the forms in Subsection (3)(a), the director shall
obtain approval from the state auditor that the forms will adequately
facilitate the post-audit of public accounts.
(4)  Before implementation by any state department or agency, the director of
the Division of Finance shall review and approve:
(a)  any accounting system developed by a state department or agency; and
(b)  any fees established by any state department or agency to recover the
costs of operations.
